Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,169
Limitations on backing vehicles.

(1) The driver of a vehicle shall not back such vehicle on any roadway unless such movement can be made with safety and without interfering with other traffic.

(2) The driver of a vehicle shall not back such vehicle upon any roadway or shoulder of any freeway.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 75;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-675;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 265.